Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4973.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [168.1257] MINNESOTA MAIN STREETS PLATES. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Issuance of plates. new text end new text begin The commissioner must issue Minnesota Main Streets special plates or a single motorcycle plate to an applicant who: new text end new text begin (1) is a registered owner of a passenger automobile, noncommercial one-ton pickup truck, motorcycle, or recreational vehicle; new text end new text begin (2) pays a fee in the amount specified under section 168.12, subdivision 5, for each set of plates, along with any other fees required by this chapter; new text end new text begin (3) pays the registration tax as required under section 168.013; new text end new text begin (4) contributes a minimum of $30 annually to the Minnesota Main Streets account; and new text end new text begin (5) complies with this chapter and rules governing registration of motor vehicles and licensing of drivers. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Design. new text end new text begin In consultation with the commissioner of employment and economic development, the commissioner must adopt a suitable plate design that includes the phrase "Legendary Landmarks" to evoke the historic sites, commercial districts, and other landmarks that reflect the variety of Minnesota's communities. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Plates transfer. new text end new text begin On application to the commissioner and payment of a transfer fee of $5, special plates issued under this section may be transferred to another motor vehicle if the subsequent vehicle is: new text end new text begin (1) qualified under subdivision 1, clause (1), to bear the special plates; and new text end new text begin (2) registered to the same individual to whom the special plates were originally issued. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Exemption. new text end new text begin Special plates issued under this section are not subject to section 168.1293, subdivision 2. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Contributions; account; appropriation. new text end new text begin Contributions collected under subdivision 1, clause (4), must be deposited in the Minnesota Main Streets account, which is established in the special revenue fund. Money in the account is annually appropriated to the commissioner of public safety. The appropriation is first for the annual cost of administering the account, and the remainder is for distribution to Rethos exclusively for the Minnesota Main Streets program. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027, for Minnesota Main Streets plates issued on or after that date. new text end